Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB165.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9107. Unified criminal justice data collection.(a) Formation of program.--The commission, in consultation with the Pennsylvania State Police, county prosecutors' offices, the court and the Department of Corrections, shall establish the Unified Criminal Justice Data Collection Program to collect, record and analyze data regarding defendants in this Commonwealth who are 18 years of age or older at the time of the commission of an alleged indictable offense or an offense defined under Subchapter A of Chapter 55 (relating to definition of offenses generally).(b) Data compilation.--In furtherance of the program, the 12345678910111213141516171819 commission shall compile data collected from the time a defendant enters the criminal justice system of the Commonwealth by arrest, charge or other action, through the final disposition of the defendant's case. The data shall include information concerning the race, ethnicity, gender and age of the defendant and be compiled in accordance with the standards of the classification of Federal data on race and ethnicity established by the Federal Office of Management and Budget. The data shall include:(1) Warrants, arrests, charges, filing of criminal complaints and indictments.(2) Dismissed or downgraded charges.(3) Cases which proceed to trial and the disposition of the cases, including convictions and guilty pleas.(4) Admission to diversionary programs, including data on program applications, and any prosecutorial or court consent or denial for a defendant's entry into diversionary programs.(5) Cases involving victims, including the race, ethnicity, gender and age of the defendant and victims in those cases.(c) Cooperation.--The Pennsylvania State Police, county prosecutors' offices, the court, offices of public defender and county and municipal police departments shall cooperate with the commission in the implementation of the program and shall assist in the collection, recording, compilation and provision of data in furtherance of the program to the extent and in the manner required by the commission.(d) Disclosure.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of any confidential or personal 20250HB0165PN0123 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 identifying information.(e) Report.--The commission shall prepare and publish an annual report summarizing the data collected, recorded and analyzed under this section and post the report on the publicly accessible Internet website of the commission. No later than August 1 of each year, the commission shall submit to the Governor's Office, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives the written report under this subsection containing summaries of the data collected, recorded and analyzed pursuant to this section. The commission shall also make recommendations as appropriate for legislative changes or improvements that could be made to the criminal justice system based on the commission's findings.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency of the Commonwealth."Court." The minor judiciary or any other court in this Commonwealth."Indictable offense." An offense other than a summary offense."Personal identifying information." The name and aliases, address, Social Security number, telephone number, facsimile number, driver's license number or email address or social media address of any defendant or victim."Program." The Unified Criminal Justice Data Collection Program established under this section.20250HB0165PN0123 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0165PN0123 - 4 - 1